Hawaii statutes.
§190D-34 Penalties. Any person who
conducts any mariculture or OTEC activities prohibited by a lease granted by
the board, or who conducts these activities in or upon state marine waters
without having obtained the approval of the board, shall be fined not more than
$10,000 for each separate offense. Each day of violation shall constitute a
separate offense. Any action taken to impose or collect the penalty provided
for in this section shall be considered a civil action. [L 1986, c 91, pt of
§1; am L 1999, c 176, §§10, 11; am L 2002, c 203, §1]

Cross References

General administrative penalties, see §187A-12.5.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next